test/src/gt-norm-yamls/vep-test-N-marj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - marj: # Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm
     marj+N+Sg+Nom: marj
     marj+N+Sg+Gen: marjan
     marj+N+Sg+Acc: [marj, marjan]
     marj+N+Sg+Par: marjad
     marj+N+Sg+Tra: marjaks
     marj+N+Sg+Abe: marjata
     marj+N+Sg+Com: marjanke
     marj+N+Sg+Ine: marjas
     marj+N+Sg+Ela: marjaspäi
     marj+N+Sg+Ill: marjaha
     marj+N+Sg+Ade: marjal
     marj+N+Sg+Abl: marjalpäi
     marj+N+Sg+All: marjale
     marj+N+Sg+EssInst: marjan
     marj+N+Sg+Prl: marjadme
     marj+N+Sg+Apr1: marjanno
     marj+N+Sg+Apr2: marjannoks
     marj+N+Sg+Egr: marjannopäi
     marj+N+Sg+Ter1: marjahosai
     marj+N+Sg+Ter2: marjalesai
     marj+N+Sg+Ter3: marjassai
     marj+N+Sg+Add1: marjahopäi
     marj+N+Sg+Add2: marjalepäi

     marj+N+Pl+Nom: marjad
     marj+N+Pl+Gen: [marjoid'en, marjoiden] # checking needed
     marj+N+Pl+Acc: marjad
     marj+N+Pl+Par: marjoid
     marj+N+Pl+Tra: marjoikš
     marj+N+Pl+Abe: marjoita
     marj+N+Pl+Com: marjoidenke
     marj+N+Pl+Ine: marjoiš
     marj+N+Pl+Ela: marjoišpäi
     marj+N+Pl+Ill: marjoihe
     marj+N+Pl+Ade: marjoil
     marj+N+Pl+Abl: marjoilpäi
     marj+N+Pl+All: marjoile
     marj+N+Pl+EssInst: marjoin
     marj+N+Pl+Prl: marjoidme
     marj+N+Pl+Apr1: marjoidenno
     marj+N+Pl+Apr2: marjoidennoks
     marj+N+Pl+Egr: marjoidennopäi
     marj+N+Pl+Ter1: marjoihesai
     marj+N+Pl+Ter2: marjoilesai
     marj+N+Pl+Add1: marjoihepäi
     marj+N+Pl+Add2: marjoilepäi

     marj+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/ki: marjki
     marj+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/ki: marjanki
     marj+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/ki: [marjki, marjanki]
     marj+N+Sg+Par+Foc/ki: marjadki
     marj+N+Sg+Tra+Foc/ki: marjakski
     marj+N+Sg+Abe+Foc/ki: marjataki
     marj+N+Sg+Com+Foc/ki: marjankeki
     marj+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/ki: marjaski
     marj+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/ki: marjaspäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/ki: marjahoki
     marj+N+Sg+Ade+Foc/ki: marjalki
     marj+N+Sg+Abl+Foc/ki: marjalpäiki
     marj+N+Sg+All+Foc/ki: marjaleki
     marj+N+Sg+EssInst+Foc/ki: marjanki
     marj+N+Sg+Prl+Foc/ki: marjadmeki
     marj+N+Sg+Apr1+Foc/ki: marjannoki
     marj+N+Sg+Apr2+Foc/ki: marjannokski
     marj+N+Sg+Egr+Foc/ki: marjannopäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter1+Foc/ki: marjahosaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter2+Foc/ki: marjalesaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Ter3+Foc/ki: marjassaiki
     marj+N+Sg+Add1+Foc/ki: marjahopäiki
     marj+N+Sg+Add2+Foc/ki: marjalepäiki

     marj+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/ki: marjadki
     marj+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/ki: [marjoid'enki, marjoidenki] # Check
     marj+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/ki: marjadki
     marj+N+Pl+Par+Foc/ki: marjoidki
     marj+N+Pl+Tra+Foc/ki: marjoikški
     marj+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/ki: marjoitaki
     marj+N+Pl+Com+Foc/ki: marjoidenkeki
     marj+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/ki: marjoiški
     marj+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/ki: marjoišpäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/ki: marjoiheki
     marj+N+Pl+Ade+Foc/ki: marjoilki
     marj+N+Pl+Abl+Foc/ki: marjoilpäiki
     marj+N+Pl+All+Foc/ki: marjoileki
     marj+N+Pl+EssInst+Foc/ki: marjoinki
     marj+N+Pl+Prl+Foc/ki: marjoidmeki
     marj+N+Pl+Apr1+Foc/ki: marjoidennoki
     marj+N+Pl+Apr2+Foc/ki: marjoidennokski
     marj+N+Pl+Egr+Foc/ki: marjoidennopäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ter1+Foc/ki: marjoihesaiki
     marj+N+Pl+Ter2+Foc/ki: marjoilesaiki
     marj+N+Pl+Add1+Foc/ki: marjoihepäiki
     marj+N+Pl+Add2+Foc/ki: marjoilepäiki
  
